District of Columbia statutes.
29-804.04

Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

(a)

Any distributions made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up shall be in equal shares among members and dissociated members, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under § 29-805.02 and any charging order in effect under § 29-805.03.

(b)

A person shall have a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company only if the company decides to make an interim distribution. A person’s dissociation shall not entitle the person to a distribution.

(c)

A person shall not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than money. Except as otherwise provided in § 29-807.05(c), a limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person’s share of distributions.

(d)

If a member or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member or transferee shall have the status of, and shall be entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution. However, the company’s obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the company by the member or a person dissociated as a member on whose account the distribution is made.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(5)(D), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the last sentence in (d).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 404 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.